Virginia statutes. Title 23.1. Institutions of Higher Education; Other Educational and Cultural Institutions.
Chapter 19. Norfolk State University.

§ 23.1-1900.
Corporate name; name of the University.

The board of visitors of Norfolk State University (the board) is a corporation under the name and style of “The Visitors of Norfolk State University” and has, in addition to its other powers, all the corporate powers given to corporations by the provisions of Title 13.1 except those powers that are confined to corporations created pursuant to Title 13.1. The board shall at all times be under the control of the General Assembly.

The institution shall be known as Norfolk State University (the University).

All laws relating to Norfolk State College or the board of visitors of Norfolk State College shall be construed as relating to the University or the board, respectively.

History.

1968, c. 532, §§ 23-174.1, 23-174.2; 1979, c. 146; 2016, c. 588.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Plea in bar regarding a question of actual or apparent authority was denied. —

In a breach of contract action filed by three coaching prospects hired by a college, where a letter from the college’s president gave the college’s head football coach and athletic director the authority to hire plaintiffs, three coaching prospects, on the college’s behalf, and the college received the benefit from said contracts; hence, the doctine of sovereign immunity did not apply. Burroughs v. Bd. of Visitors, 66 Va. Cir. 120, 2004 Va. Cir. LEXIS 350 (Norfolk Oct. 18, 2004).

§ 23.1-1901.
Membership; executive committee.

The board of visitors shall consist of 13 members appointed by the Governor, of whom at least four shall be alumni of the University. Of the alumni appointed, at least one shall be a resident of the Commonwealth.

The alumni association of the University may submit to the Governor a list of four nominees for each vacancy on the board, whether the vacancy occurs by expiration of a term or otherwise. The Governor may appoint a member from the list of nominees.

The board may appoint at least three and not more than five of its members to an executive committee that has and may exercise such powers as the board may prescribe.

History.

1968, c. 532, § 23-174.4; 1980, c. 625; 1999, c. 1013; 2000, c. 844; 2003, c. 802; 2016, c. 588.

§ 23.1-1902.
Powers and duties.

The board shall (i) make all provisions for teachers, staff members, and agents, fix their salaries, and prescribe their duties and (ii) generally direct the affairs of the University.

The board may take, hold, receive, and enjoy any gift, grant, devise, or bequest to the University for the uses and purposes designated by the donor, or if not so designated, for the general purposes of the board.

The board may confer degrees.

History.

1968, c. 532, §§ 23-174.5, 23-174.6, 23-174.7; 1979, c. 146; 2016, c. 588.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Plea in bar regarding a question of actual or apparent authority was denied. —

In a breach of contract action filed by three coaching prospects hired by a college, where a letter from the college’s president gave the college’s head football coach and athletic director the authority to hire plaintiffs, three coaching prospects, on the college’s behalf, and the college received the benefit from said contracts; hence, the doctine of sovereign immunity did not apply. Burroughs v. Bd. of Visitors, 66 Va. Cir. 120, 2004 Va. Cir. LEXIS 350 (Norfolk Oct. 18, 2004).